Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

7-62-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Certificate of limited partnership" means the certificate referred to in section 7-62-201, and the certificate as amended.

"Contribution" means any cash, property, services rendered, or a promissory note or other binding obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services that a partner contributes to a limited partnership in the partner's capacity as a partner.

"Event of withdrawal of a general partner" means an event that causes a person to cease to be a general partner as provided in section

7-62-402

.

(3.5) and (4) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2241, § 123, effective July 1, 2004.)

(5) "General partner" means a person:

Who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a general partner in accordance with the partnership agreement or this article, including a person who is admitted as a general partner without making or being obligated to make a contribution or without acquiring a partnership interest, if in either case such admission is pursuant to a written partnership agreement or other writing confirming the admission; and

Who is named in the certificate of limited partnership as a general partner.

(5.5) "Limited liability partnership" means a limited liability partnership as defined in section

7-60-102

(4.7) or section

7-64-101

(13).

(6) "Limited partner" means a person who has been admitted to a limited partnership as a limited partner in accordance with the partnership agreement or this article, including a person who is admitted as a limited partner without making or being obligated to make a contribution or without acquiring a partnership interest, if in either case such admission is pursuant to a written partnership agreement or other writing confirming the admission, as provided in sections

7-62-301

and

7-62-306

or, in the case of a foreign limited partnership, in accordance with the law of the foreign jurisdiction under which the limited partnership is formed.

(7) "Limited partnership" or "domestic limited partnership" means an entity formed under this article by two or more persons and having one or more general partners and one or more limited partners. A limited liability limited partnership is for all purposes a limited partnership. At formation, a limited partnership shall have at least one partner who has a partnership interest.

(8) "Partner" means a limited or general partner.

(9) "Partnership agreement" means any valid agreement, written or oral, of the partners as to the affairs of a limited partnership and the conduct of its business.

(10) "Partnership interest" means a partner's share of the profits and losses of a limited partnership and the right to receive distributions of partnership assets.

(11) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2241, § 123, effective July 1, 2004.)

(12) "Limited liability limited partnership" means a domestic limited partnership that has registered under section

7-60-144

or

7-64-1002

.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 433, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(6) amended, p. 448, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(4) and (7) amended and (3.5), (5.5), and (12) added, p. 787, § 12, effective May 24.

L. 97:

(5.5) and (12) amended, p. 916, § 4, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(3.5), (4), (6), (7), (11), and (12) amended, p. 2241, § 123, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2), (5.5), (7), and (12) amended, p. 1439, § 123, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(5), (6), and (7) amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1129, § 4, effective May 14.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-62-102. Name of limited partnership. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 434, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(2) added, p. 448, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(c) amended, p. 446, § 7, effective April 18.

L. 97:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended and (3) added, p. 1498, § 2, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-62-103. Reservation of name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 434, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-62-104. Registered office - registered agent - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 449, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-62-104.5. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to limited partnerships.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 2241, § 124, effective July 1, 2004.

7-62-105. Records.

Each limited partnership shall keep at an office stated in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or, if no such provision is made, at the street address of the principal office, if any, of the limited partnership or, if none, at the street address of the registered agent, the following:

A current list of the full name and last-known business, residence, or mailing address of each partner, stating separately the general partners and the limited partners, stated in alphabetical order;

A copy of the certificate of limited partnership and all certificates of amendment thereto, together with executed copies of any powers of attorney pursuant to which any certificate has been executed or delivered to the secretary of state for filing;

Copies of the limited partnership's federal, state, and local income tax returns and reports, if any, for the three most recent years;

Copies of any currently effective written partnership agreements, copies of any writings permitted or required under section 7-62-502 (2) and (3), and copies of any financial statements of the limited partnership for the three most recent years; and

Unless contained in a written partnership agreement or in a writing permitted or required under section 7-62-502 (2) and (3), a statement prepared and certified as accurate by the general partners which describes:

The amount of cash and a description and statement of the agreed value of the other property or services contributed by each partner and which each partner has agreed to contribute in the future;

The times at which or events on the happening of which any additional contributions agreed to be made by each partner are to be made;

If agreed upon, the time at which or the events on the happening of which a partner may terminate the partner's membership in the limited partnership and the amount of, or the method of determining, the distribution to which the partner may be entitled respecting the partner's partnership interest and the terms and conditions of the termination and distribution;

Any right of a partner to receive, or of a general partner to make, distributions to a partner which include a return of all or any part of the partner's contribution.

Such records are subject to inspection and copying at the reasonable request, and at the expense, of any partner during ordinary business hours.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended and (1)(e) added, p. 449, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, p. 2241, § 125, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and (1)(e)(III) amended, p. 1440, § 124, effective July 1.

7-62-106. Nature of business.

A limited partnership may carry on any business that a partnership without limited partners may carry on except as prohibited by law.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective November 1.

7-62-107. Business transactions of partner with the partnership.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to, act as surety for, and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect thereto as a person who is not a partner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective November 1.

7-62-108. Service of process on limited partnership - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2003:

(6) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-62-109. Conversion of limited partnership into other entities - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 788, § 13, effective May 24.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 916, § 5, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-62-110. Statute of frauds - applicability.

A partnership agreement is not subject to any statute of frauds, including section 38-10-112, C.R.S., regarding void agreements, but not including any requirement under this article that a particular action or provision be reflected in a writing.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1333), ch. 241, p. 986, § 1, effective August 10.